Hawaii, session 2026, HB2483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $6,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the forty-fifth representative district, as follows: 1.        Waianae Boat Harbor, Oahu Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances to upgrade the boat harbor to include one-hundred and nine berths, seven ramps, a fish hoist, a harbor master's facility building, and public restroom within the harbor master's facility building. Total funding                          $6,500,000 SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2029, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________